Utah statutes.
58-31b-601 (Superseded 01/01/13).   Minimum standards for nursing programs -- Medication aide training.

(1)  A nursing education program shall be affiliated with an accredited institution of higher education in order to be approved by the division.

(2)  The minimum standards a nursing program shall meet to qualify graduates for licensure under this chapter shall be defined by division rule.

(3)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, and the provisions of this chapter, the division shall make rules defining the minimum standards for a medication aide certified training program to qualify a person for certification under this chapter as a medication aide certified.

